Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 7. Alaska Mental Health Board.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose of the Act that enacted this article, see § 1, ch. 48, SLA 1987 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 47.30.661.
Alaska Mental Health Board.

The Alaska Mental Health Board is established. For budgetary purposes, the board is located within the department. The board is the state planning and coordinating agency for the purposes of federal and state laws relating to the mental health program of the state. The purpose of the board is to assist the state in ensuring an integrated comprehensive mental health program.

History.

(§ 6 ch 48 SLA 1987)

Sec. 47.30.662.
Composition; non-voting members.

The board consists of not fewer than 12 nor more than 16 members appointed by the governor, with due regard for the demographics of the state and balanced geographic representation of the state. The membership and committees of the board shall fulfill the requirements of P.L. 99-660, as amended.

Not less than one-half of the members shall be persons with a mental disorder identified in AS

47.30.056(b)(1)

or members of their families.

The board members

shall include the director of the division of the department responsible for mental health; and

may include representatives of the principal state agencies with respect to education, vocational rehabilitation, criminal justice, housing, social services, medical assistance, substance abuse, and aging.

Board members appointed under (c) of this section may not vote on matters before the board.

The board members shall include at least two licensed mental health professionals who represent public and private providers of mental health services and at least one member who is admitted to practice law in the state. Members appointed under this subsection may also be family members identified under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 48 SLA 1987; am § 37 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 34 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am § 75 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to members of the board as affected by the 1991 and 1994 amendments, see § 46, ch. 5, FSSLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (c)(1), substituted “division of the department responsible for mental health” for “division of mental health and developmental disabilities in the department”.

Sec. 47.30.663.
Terms of office; vacancies; removal.

Board members serve staggered terms of three years.

A vacancy occurring in the membership of the board shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the unexpired portion of the vacated term.

Members may be removed only for cause, including, but not limited to, poor attendance or lack of contribution to the board’s work.

History.

(§ 6 ch 48 SLA 1987)

Sec. 47.30.664.
Officers and staff.

The board, by a majority of its membership, shall annually elect a chair and other officers it considers necessary from among its membership.

The board shall have a paid staff provided by the department, including, but not limited to, an executive director who shall be selected by the board. The executive director is in the partially exempt service and may hire additional employees in the classified service of the state. The department shall provide for the assignment of personnel to the board to ensure the board has the capacity to fulfill its responsibilities. The executive director of the board shall be directly responsible to the board in the performance of the director’s duties.

History.

(§ 6 ch 48 SLA 1987; am § 38 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.30.665.
Bylaws.

The board, on approval of a majority of its membership and consistent with state law, shall adopt and amend bylaws governing its composition, proceedings, and other activities consistent with state law and including, but not limited to, provisions concerning a quorum to transact board business and other aspects of procedure, frequency and location of meetings, and establishment, functions, and membership of committees.

History.

(§ 6 ch 48 SLA 1987)

Sec. 47.30.666.
Duties of the board.

The board is the state planning and coordinating body for the purpose of federal and state laws relating to mental health services for persons with mental disorders identified in AS

47.30.056(b)(1)

. On behalf of those persons, the board shall

prepare and maintain a comprehensive plan of treatment and rehabilitation services;

propose an annual implementation plan consistent with the comprehensive plan and with due regard for the findings from evaluation of existing programs;

provide a public forum for the discussion of issues related to the mental health services for which the board has planning and coordinating responsibility;

advocate the needs of persons with mental disorders before the governor, executive agencies, the legislature, and the public;

advise the legislature, the governor, the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority, and other state agencies in matters affecting persons with mental disorders, including, but not limited to,

development of necessary services for diagnosis, treatment, and rehabilitation;

evaluation of the effectiveness of programs in the state for diagnosis, treatment, and rehabilitation;

legal processes that affect screening, diagnosis, treatment, and rehabilitation;

provide to the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority for its review and consideration recommendations concerning the integrated comprehensive mental health program for those persons who are described in AS

47.30.056(b)(1)

and the use of money in the mental health trust settlement income account in a manner consistent with regulations adopted under AS

47.30.031

; and

submit periodic reports regarding its planning, evaluation, advocacy, and other activities.

History.

(§ 6 ch 48 SLA 1987; am § 39 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 35 ch 5 FSSLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in paragraph (6) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

Sec. 47.30.667.
Compensation, per diem, and expenses.

The board members appointed under AS

47.30.662(b)

and (e) are not entitled to a salary, but are entitled to per diem, reimbursement for travel, and other expenses authorized by law for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 40 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.30.669.
Definition.

In AS

47.30.661

—

47.30.669

, “board” means the Alaska Mental Health Board established in AS

47.30.661

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 48 SLA 1987)